District of Columbia statutes.
29-909

Bylaws — Contents.

The bylaws may, within the limitations of this chapter, provide for the:

(1)

Method and terms of admission to membership and the disposal of members’ interests on cessation of membership for any reason;

(2)

Time, place, and manner of calling and conducting meetings;

(3)

Number or percentage of the members constituting a quorum;

(4)

(A)

Number, qualifications, powers, duties, term of office, and manner, time, and vote for election, of directors and officers; and

(B)

Division or classification, if any, of directors to provide for rotating or overlapping terms;

(5)

Compensation, if any, of the directors, and the number of directors necessary to constitute a quorum;

(6)

Method of distributing the net savings; or

(7)

Various discretionary provisions of this chapter as well as other provisions incident to the purposes and activities and affairs of the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(3), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-909.
1981 Ed., § 29-1109.
1973 Ed., § 29-809.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (7).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.